Washington statutes.
RCW 18.106.270

Infraction—Monetary penalties—Suspension—Rules.

(1) A person found to have committed an infraction under RCW 18.106.020 shall be assessed a minimum monetary penalty of one hundred dollars for the first infraction. A contractor found to have committed an infraction under RCW 18.106.020 must be assessed a minimum monetary penalty of five hundred dollars for the first infraction. The maximum penalty for an infraction under RCW 18.106.020 must not exceed five thousand dollars for a second or subsequent infraction. The department shall set by rule a schedule of penalties for infractions imposed under this chapter.

(2) The administrative law judge may not waive, reduce, or suspend the monetary penalty imposed for the infraction.

(3) The director may waive or reduce collection of payment for good cause.

(4) Any individual or plumbing contractor who acquires three infractions within a thirty-six month period may have his or her certificate, license, endorsement, or registration suspended for a period of up to two years upon recommendation of the advisory board of plumbers. For purposes of this subsection, multiple violations created by a single inspection or audit are counted as one violation.

(5) Monetary penalties collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the plumbing certificate fund.

[ 2020 c 153 s 19; 1994 c 174 s 8; 1983 c 124 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 174: See note following RCW 18.106.020.

Effective date—1983 c 124: See note following RCW 18.106.020.